Utah statutes.
10-6-138.   City recorder to countersign contracts -- Indexed record of contracts.

The city recorder shall countersign all contracts made on behalf of the city and shall maintain a properly indexed record of all such contracts.



Enacted by Chapter 26, 1979 General Session

